Tennessee, session 114, HB0165.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-7-103(a), is amended by deleting
the language "From January 15 to April 15 of each year" and substituting instead the language
"From January 1 to April 15 of each year".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0165
000979
- 1 -